Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
ARTICLE 40 STATE LOTTERY DIVISION
44-40-109. Commission - powers and duties - rules.

In addition to any other powers and duties set forth in this article 40, the commission has the following powers and duties:

To promulgate rules governing the establishment and operation of the lottery as it deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this article 40. The director shall prepare and submit to the commission written recommendations concerning proposed rules for this purpose. Although the commission is a type 2 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105, the commission has full and exclusive authority to promulgate rules related to the lottery without any approval by, or delegation of authority from, the department.

To conduct hearings upon complaints charging violations of this article 40 or rules promulgated pursuant to this article 40, other than any hearings relating to the granting, suspension, revocation, or renewal of licenses for lottery sales agents, and to conduct other hearings as may be provided by rules of the commission;

To carry on a continuous study and investigation of the lottery throughout the state for the purpose of ascertaining any defects in this article 40 or in the rules issued under this article 40 whereby any abuses in the administration and operation of the lottery or any evasion of this article 40 or the rules may arise or be practiced, for the purpose of formulating recommendations for changes in this article 40 and the rules to prevent any abuses and evasions, to guard against the use of this article 40 and the rules as a cloak for the carrying on of organized gambling and crime, and to ensure that the law and rules shall be in the form and be so administered as to serve the true purposes of this article 40;

To report immediately to the governor, the attorney general, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, the minority leaders of both houses, and any other state officers, as from time to time the commission deems appropriate, any matters that it deems to require an immediate change in the laws of this state in order to prevent abuses and evasions of this article 40 or rules promulgated thereunder or to rectify undesirable conditions in connection with the administration or operation of the lottery;

To require any special reports from the director that it may consider desirable;

To authorize and issue revenue bonds pursuant to the provisions of section 44-40-122;

To annually set the amount of the performance bond required of persons entering into contracts to provide materials, equipment, or supplies used in the operation of the lottery or to design or install games or lotteries; and

To investigate and participate in multistate agreements and to regulate multistate lotteries. The director shall act as the commission's agent in the investigations if the commission so directs.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must include:

The types of lotteries to be conducted, but no lottery conducted under this article 40 other than instant scratch games shall be based upon the game of chance commonly known as bingo, nor shall any lottery be conducted that depends upon the outcome of any athletic contest except races at state-licensed dog or horse tracks if approved by the Colorado racing commission;

The price of tickets or shares in the lottery;

The numbers, sizes, and payment of the prizes on the winning tickets or shares;

The manner of selecting the winning tickets or shares. All drawings shall be held in public and witnessed by an independent auditor employed by a certified public accountant firm, and all drawing equipment used in the public drawings must be examined prior to and after each public drawing by an independent auditor employed by a certified public accountant firm.

The frequency of the drawing or selection of winning tickets or shares, without limitation;

Without limit to number, the types of locations where tickets or shares may be sold; except that the commission shall not promulgate any rule, issue any order, or adopt any policy or interpretation before July 1, 2017, that authorizes or permits the purchase of tickets, including instant scratch tickets, or shares by means of the internet, telephone, computer, or any other electronic device or equipment that the purchaser can access or use to purchase lottery tickets other than by doing so personally at a licensed lottery sales agent's physical place of business;

The method to be used in selling tickets or shares;

The manner and amount of compensation, if any, to be paid licensed sales agents necessary to provide for the adequate availability of tickets or shares to prospective buyers and for the convenience of the public;

The manner in which lottery sales revenues are to be collected.

The commission shall promulgate rules pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for the general administration of all instant scratch games. The rules must include:

The method to be used in selling instant scratch game tickets;

The method of paying prizes on winning instant scratch game tickets; and

The manner and amount of compensation, if any, to be paid to licensed sales agents necessary to provide for the adequate availability of instant scratch game tickets to prospective buyers and for the convenience of the public.

The commission shall establish and approve all instructions governing instant scratch games. The instructions shall include, but shall not be limited to:

The method for determining instant scratch game winners;

The establishment of claim periods;

The price of instant scratch game tickets;

The numbers and sizes of prizes; and

The method for selecting and validating winning instant scratch game tickets.

The commission shall publish all approved instructions governing instant scratch games in a clearly identifiable section on the official website of the state lottery. The published instructions shall be binding on purchasers and claimants of instant scratch game tickets.

The procedural rule-making requirements of section 24-4-103 shall not apply to the commission's duties specified in this subsection (3)(b).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 346, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

IP(1) and (1)(a) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3363, § 38, effective August 10; IP(2), (2)(g), IP(3)(a), and (3)(a)(I) amended, (HB 22-1402), ch. 402, p. 2868, § 7, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-35-208 as it existed prior to 2018.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

44-40-110. Conflict of interest.

Members of the commission and employees of the division are declared to be positions of public trust and, therefore, in order to insure the confidence of the people of the state in the integrity of the division, its employees, and the commission, the following restrictions shall apply:

No member of the commission or employee of the division, including the director, and no member of their immediate families, shall have any personal pecuniary interest in any lottery or in the sale of any lottery tickets or shares or in any corporation, association, or firm contracting with the state to supply gaming equipment or materials for use in the operation of the lottery or in any corporation, association, or firm licensed as a sales agent under this article 40. Employment by any political subdivision, or service on the governing body or on any board, agency, or commission of any political subdivision that is entitled to receive a portion of the proceeds of the lottery shall not constitute an interest prohibited by this section, except for the purposes of appointment to or service on the commission.

No member of the commission or employee of the division, including the director, and no member of their immediate families, shall receive any gift, gratuity, employment, or other thing of value from any person, corporation, association, or firm that contracts with or that offers services, supplies, materials, or equipment used by the division in the normal course of its operations.

No member of the commission or employee of the division, including the director, and no member of their immediate families, shall purchase any ticket for any lottery conducted under this article 40; except that lottery investigators may purchase lottery tickets when authorized to do so by the director for investigative purposes. No person described in this subsection (1)(c) shall be eligible to receive any prize awarded in such a lottery.

No person, corporation, or firm that contracts with the division or that offers services, supplies, materials, or equipment used by the division in the normal course of its operations shall offer any gift, gratuity, employment, or other thing of value to any commission member, employee of the division, or members of their immediate families except as authorized by rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section.

No member of the commission or employee of the division who terminates his or her relationship with the commission or the division shall, for a period of one year from the date of termination of membership on the commission or employment with the division, as applicable, accept employment with any lottery vendor or represent any lottery vendor before the division or the commission.

The commission shall adopt by rule a code of ethics that shall be binding upon all of its members. Each member of the commission shall complete training at least once each year on the code and shall further certify on an annual basis that he or she is knowledgeable about the code and has no conflicts of interest proscribed by this section.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 349, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-35-209 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-40-111. Lottery fund - creation - definitions.

There is hereby created, in the office of the state treasurer, the lottery fund. The initial appropriation to the division, and all subsequent revenues of the division not earlier paid as prizes, shall be paid into the lottery fund. All expenses of the division, including the expenses of organized crime investigation and prosecution relating to the lottery, shall be paid from the lottery fund. For the purposes of this section and section 44-40-109, "expenses" do not include amounts expended for lottery prizes. Prizes for the lottery shall be paid only from the lottery fund or from money collected from the sale of lottery tickets or shares. Amounts for prizes and expenses are hereby appropriated to the division, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(1.5) For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, and for each state fiscal year thereafter, the general assembly shall appropriate two hundred thousand dollars from the lottery fund to the division to cover expenses relating to the division's efforts to promote responsible gaming in the state.

The division shall deposit all liquidated damages into the lottery fund, and any revenues received from liquidated damages shall not be expended by the division unless appropriated by the general assembly. The division shall not receive any goods or services in lieu of an assessment of liquidated damages, nor shall the division require a vendor to purchase goods and services in lieu of an assessment of liquidated damages.

Expenses of the division shall be paid from the lottery fund only as appropriated by the general assembly.

Upon request, it is the duty of the state treasurer to report to the director or the commission the amount of money on hand in the lottery fund. All accounts and expenditures from the lottery fund shall be certified by the director and paid by the state treasurer upon warrants drawn by the controller. The controller is authorized as directed to draw warrants payable out of the lottery fund upon vouchers therefor properly certified.

The amount to be transferred from the lottery fund to the conservation trust fund shall be forty percent of the net proceeds of the lottery for the preceding fiscal quarter after payment of the expenses of the division and any prizes for the lottery and after reserving sufficient money, as of the end of the fiscal year, to ensure the operation of the lottery for the ensuing fiscal year. The money reserved by the lottery shall be held in cash and investments. Beginning with the fourth quarter of fiscal year 1998-99, and each fiscal year thereafter, distributions of net lottery proceeds to the conservation trust fund shall be made in accordance with the provisions of section 33-60-104 (1)(a).

Beginning with the first quarter of fiscal year 1998-99 and each fiscal year thereafter, distributions of net lottery proceeds to the division of parks and wildlife shall be made in accordance with the provisions of section 33-60-104 (1)(b).

The appropriation of money from the state lottery for capital construction shall be consistent with part 13 of article 3 of title 2 until part 13 is repealed.

The lottery money available for appropriation to the division of parks and wildlife pursuant to subsection (5)(b) of this section shall be appropriated and expended for the acquisition and development of new state parks, new state recreation areas, or new recreational trails, for the expansion of existing state parks, state recreation areas, or recreational trails, or for capital improvements of both new and existing state parks, state recreation areas, or recreational trails. Except as provided in section 33-60-105, in addition to appropriation for the division's capital construction budget, said lottery money may be appropriated for the division's operating budget for expenditures attributable to the maintenance and operation of state parks, state recreation areas, or recreational trails, or any portions thereof, that have been acquired or developed with lottery money.

This subsection (5) becomes effective on September 1, 1998.

The state treasurer shall invest the money in the lottery fund so long as said money is timely available to pay the expenses of the division, to pay the prizes to the lottery winners, to make authorized transfers to the conservation trust fund, and to fund the annual appropriations authorized by subsection (5) of this section. Investments shall be those otherwise permitted by state law, and interest or any other return on the investments shall be paid into the lottery fund.

The division shall be operated so that, after the initial state appropriation, it shall be self-sustaining.

No claim for the payment of any expense of the division or the payment of any lottery prize can be made unless it is against the lottery fund or against money collected from the sale of lottery tickets or shares. No other money of the state of Colorado shall be used or obligated to pay the expenses of the division or prizes of the lottery.

The total disbursements for lottery prizes shall be no less than fifty percent of the total revenue accruing from the sale of lottery tickets or shares.

Net lottery proceeds to be distributed to the conservation trust fund, as computed pursuant to this section, shall be transferred to the conservation trust subaccount of the lottery fund, which subaccount is hereby created, once each month. Transfers shall be made from net lottery proceeds reflected in the monthly statement for the period ending sixty days prior to each monthly distribution. The state treasurer shall invest all money in the conservation trust subaccount in investments permitted by state law. Notwithstanding subsection (6) of this section, interest or any other return on the investments of the conservation trust subaccount must be distributed to the conservation trust fund.

Beginning with the first quarter of fiscal year 1998-99, distributions shall be made on a quarterly basis in accordance with the provisions of section 33-60-104, with the distribution of net lottery proceeds for the first quarter occurring on December 1 of the fiscal year, distribution of net lottery proceeds for the second quarter occurring on March 1 of the fiscal year, distribution of net lottery proceeds for the third quarter occurring on June 1 of the fiscal year, and distribution of net lottery proceeds for the fourth quarter occurring on September 1 following the close of the fiscal year.

The general assembly may establish priorities in the general appropriation act for expenditures for projects to be financed from net lottery proceeds appropriated for capital construction. The priorities shall govern the use of quarterly distributions from the lottery fund in order to assure that available revenues are used to fund higher priority projects before they are used to fund lower priority projects.

As used in this subsection (12), unless the context otherwise requires:

"Outdoor equity fund" means the outdoor equity fund created in section 33-9-206.

"Parks and outdoor recreation cash fund" means the parks and outdoor recreation cash fund created in section 33-10-111 (1).

"Public school capital construction assistance fund" means the public school capital construction assistance fund created in section 22-43.7-104.

"Wildlife cash fund" means the wildlife cash fund created in section 33-1-112 (1)(a).

Pursuant to subsection (10)(b) of this section, the state treasurer shall transfer money that would otherwise be allocated to the general fund pursuant to section 3 (1)(b)(III) of article XXVII of the state constitution, and as described in section 33-60-104 (1)(c), as follows:

For the 2020-21 state fiscal year, to the extent available, the first seven hundred fifty thousand dollars to the outdoor equity fund; the next three million dollars to the public school capital construction assistance fund; and any remaining money as follows: Twenty-five percent to the wildlife cash fund, twenty-five percent to the parks and outdoor recreation cash fund, and fifty percent to the public school capital construction assistance fund;

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year, to the extent available, the first one million five hundred thousand dollars to the outdoor equity fund; the next three million dollars to the public school capital construction assistance fund; and any remaining money as follows: Twenty-five percent to the wildlife cash fund, twenty-five percent to the parks and outdoor recreation cash fund, and fifty percent to the public school capital construction assistance fund;

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, to the extent available, the first two million two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the outdoor equity fund; the next three million dollars to the public school capital construction assistance fund; and any remaining money as follows: Twenty-five percent to the wildlife cash fund, twenty-five percent to the parks and outdoor recreation cash fund, and fifty percent to the public school capital construction assistance fund; and

For the 2023-24 state fiscal year and each state fiscal year thereafter, to the extent available, the first three million dollars to the outdoor equity fund; the next three million dollars to the public school capital construction assistance fund; and any remaining money as follows: Twenty-five percent to the wildlife cash fund, twenty-five percent to the parks and outdoor recreation cash fund, and fifty percent to the public school capital construction assistance fund.

The money transferred under this subsection (12) and any income and interest derived from the deposit and investment of such money is exempt from any restriction on spending, revenue, or appropriations, including, without limitation, the restrictions of section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 350, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(10)(a) amended, (SB 19-241), ch. 390, p. 3482, § 72, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(12) added, (HB 21-1318), ch. 272, p. 1578, § 2, effective June 21.

L. 2022:

(1.5) added, (HB 22-1402), ch. 402, p. 2867, § 5, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-35-210 as it existed prior to 2018.

Cross references:

For the creation of the conservation trust fund, see § 29-21-101 (2).

44-40-112. Audits and annual reports.

The lottery fund shall be audited at least annually by or under the direction of the state auditor, who shall submit a report of the audit to the legislative audit committee. The annual audit shall include compliance with section 3 of article XXVII of the state constitution. The expenses of the audit shall be paid from the lottery fund.

The director shall evaluate the lottery's expenditures to determine areas where the expenditures may be reduced with the goal of increasing net proceeds as a percentage of sales paid to the beneficiaries. Not later than July 1, 2005, the director shall report to the governor, the legislative audit committee, and the joint budget committee on any recommendations he or she desires to make based upon the evaluation.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 352, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-35-211 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-40-113. Prizes.

The right of any person to a prize is not assignable; except that payment of any prize may be paid to:

The estate of a deceased prizewinner; or

Any person pursuant to a voluntary assignment of the right to receive future annual prize payments, in whole or in part, if the assignment is made pursuant to an appropriate judicial order of the district court located in the city and county of Denver or the judicial district where the assignor resides or where the commission's headquarters are located.

A copy of the petition for an order described in subsection (1)(b) of this section and of all notices of any hearing in the matter shall be served on the executive director no later than ten days prior to any hearing or entry of any order.

The commission may intervene as of right in any proceeding solely to protect the interests of the commission but shall not be deemed an indispensable or necessary party.

The court receiving the petition is authorized to issue an order approving the assignment and directing the executive director to pay to the assignee all future prize payments so assigned upon finding that all of the following conditions have been met:

The assignment has been memorialized in writing and executed by the assignor and is subject to Colorado law;

The assignor provides a sworn declaration to the court attesting to the facts that the assignor has had the opportunity to be represented by independent legal counsel in connection with the assignment, has received independent financial and tax advice concerning the effects of the assignment, and is of sound mind and not acting under duress; and

The proposed assignment does not and will not include or cover payments or portions of payments subject to offsets pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, unless appropriate provision is made in the order to satisfy the obligations giving rise to the offset.

Within ten days of receipt of a certified copy of a court order granted pursuant to this subsection (2), the executive director shall acknowledge in writing to both the assignor and the assignee the executive director's agreement to make the payments in accordance with the provisions of the order. The executive director shall make the payments pursuant to said order.

The commission shall not adopt rules for the implementation of this subsection (2) that are more restrictive than the provisions of this subsection (2), that impose requirements in addition to those set forth in this subsection (2), or that are inconsistent with the expressed intent of the general assembly.

The executive director is authorized to establish a reasonable fee to defray any administrative expenses of the executive director associated with assignments made pursuant to this section. The fee amounts shall reflect the direct and indirect costs associated with processing the assignments.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article 40 to the contrary, the commission may authorize licensed sales agents to retain all prizes pursuant to the rules of the commission for the persons entitled to the prizes for one hundred eighty days after the termination dates of the lottery games for which the prizes were won. The prizes shall be held in trust on behalf of the division for payment to the persons so entitled. No separate accounting of the prizes needs to be made by the licensed sales agent unless requested by the director. Any person who fails to claim a prize during the one-hundred-eighty-day period shall forfeit all rights to the prize, and the amount of the prize shall become the property of the licensee. All other unclaimed prizes shall be retained by the division for the persons entitled to the prizes for the one-hundred-eighty-day period. Any person who fails to claim a prize that is held by the division or its designee during that time shall forfeit all rights to the prize, and the amount of the prize shall remain in the lottery fund.

The division shall be discharged of all liability upon the payment of any prize pursuant to this article 40.

Any prize won by a person under eighteen years of age who purchased a winning ticket in violation of section 44-40-116 (1)(c) shall be forfeited. If a person otherwise entitled to a prize or a winning ticket is under eighteen years of age, the director may direct payment of the prize by delivery to an adult member of the minor's family or a guardian of the minor of a check or draft payable to the order of the minor.

Prior to the payment of any lottery cash prize or noncash prize required by rule of the commission to be paid only at the lottery offices and subject to state and federal tax reporting, the department of revenue shall require the winner to submit the winner's social security number and federal employer identification number, if applicable, and shall check the social security number of the winner with those certified by the department of human services for the purpose of the state lottery winnings offset as provided in section 26-13-118. For a lottery cash prize, beginning January 1, 2012, the department of revenue shall also check the social security number of the winner with those certified by the department of personnel for the purpose of the state lottery winnings offset as provided in section 24-30-202.7. The social security number and the federal employer identification number shall not become part of the public record of the department of revenue. If the social security number of a lottery winner appears among those certified by the department of human services, the department of revenue shall obtain the current address of the winner, notify the department of human services, and suspend the payment of the cash prize or noncash prize until the requirements of section 26-13-118 are met. If, after consulting with the department of human services, the department of revenue determines that the lottery winner owes a child support debt or child support costs pursuant to section 14-14-104, or owes child support arrearages as part of an enforcement action pursuant to article 5 of title 14, or owes child support arrearages or child support costs that are the subject of enforcement services provided pursuant to section 26-13-106, then the department of revenue shall withhold from the amount of the cash prize paid to the lottery winner an amount equal to the amount of child support debt, child support arrearages, and child support costs that are due or, if the amount of the cash prize is less than or equal to the amount of child support debt, arrearages, and costs due, shall withhold the entire amount of the lottery cash prize. Any cash prize so withheld for the department of human services shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for disbursement by the department of human services as directed in section 26-13-118. If the social security number of a lottery cash prize winner appears among those certified by the department of personnel, the department of revenue shall obtain the current address of the winner, notify the department of personnel, and suspend the payment of the cash prize until the requirements of section 24-30-202.7 are met. If, after consulting with the department of personnel, the department of revenue determines that the lottery winner owes an outstanding debt that has been certified pursuant to section 24-30-202.7, then the department of revenue shall withhold from the amount of the cash prize paid to the lottery winner an amount equal to the amount of the outstanding debt or, if the amount of the cash prize is less than or equal to the amount of the outstanding debt, shall withhold the entire amount of the lottery cash prize. Any cash prize so withheld for the department of personnel shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for disbursement in accordance with section 24-30-202.7 (4).

A lottery winner of a noncash prize who owes child support debt, child support arrearages, or child support costs shall forfeit the prize, unless:

All of the child support debt, child support arrearages, and child support costs are paid by the lottery winner within ten working days after claiming the suspended noncash prize; and

The department of human services has notified the department of revenue that payment has been received; or

An administrative review is requested pursuant to section 26-13-118 (2), and the requirements set forth in subsection (6)(c) of this section are met.

If an administrative review is requested pursuant to section 26-13-118 (2), the noncash prize shall remain suspended until the department of human services notifies the department of revenue that the administrative review process has been completed pursuant to rules of the state board of human services. If at the administrative review it is determined that the winner owes child support debt, child support arrearages, or child support costs, the winner shall forfeit the noncash prize unless:

The winner pays the child support debt, child support arrearages, and child support costs in full within ten days after the date of the letter informing the lottery winner of the results of the administrative review; and

The department of human services notifies the department of revenue that payment has been received.

If forfeited by the lottery winner, the noncash prize shall be sold at fair market value. The proceeds of the sale shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for disbursement in accordance with the requirements of section 26-13-118 (3).

Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (6) to the contrary, if, in addition to owing an outstanding debt, a lottery winner owes restitution, fines, fees, costs, or surcharges, as described in section 44-40-114 or a child support debt or arrearages or child support costs as described in this subsection (6), any lottery winnings offset against the restitution, fines, fees, costs, or surcharges, or child support debt or arrearages or child support costs shall take priority and be applied first. If, in such instance, the lottery winner owes these types of debts, these offsets shall take priority and the provisions of section 44-40-114 (3) shall apply.

The remaining lottery winning money, if any, after the offsets described in subsection (6)(e)(I) of this section shall be applied toward the payment of outstanding debt and processed in accordance with this section.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, all or any part of a prize won by a person may be pledged as collateral for a loan; however, the pledging of all or any part of the prize creates no liability to the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 353, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(6)(a), (6)(b)(I)(B), IP(6)(c), and (6)(c)(II) amended, (SB 19-241), ch. 390, p. 3482, § 73, effective August 2; (6)(e)(I) amended, (HB 19-1128), ch. 238, p. 2359, § 3, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-35-212 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-40-114. Prizes - lottery winnings offset for restitution, fines, fees, costs, or surcharges.

Prior to the payment of any lottery winnings required by rule of the commission to be paid only at the lottery offices, the department of revenue shall require the winner to submit the winner's social security number and federal employer identification number, if applicable, and shall check the social security number of the winner with those certified by the judicial department for the purpose of the state lottery winnings offset as provided in sections 16-11-101.8 and 16-18.5-106.5. The social security number and the federal employer identification number shall not become part of the public record of the department of revenue.

If the social security number of a lottery winner appears among those certified by the judicial department, the department of revenue shall suspend the payment of the winnings until the requirements of sections 16-11-101.8 and 16-18.5-106.5 are met. If, after consulting with the judicial department, the department of revenue determines that the lottery winner is obligated to pay the amounts certified under sections 16-11-101.8 and 16-18.5-106.5, then the department of revenue shall withhold from the amount of winnings paid to the lottery winner an amount equal to the amount that is due or, if the amount of winnings is less than or equal to the amount due, shall withhold the entire amount of the lottery winnings. Any money so withheld shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for disbursement as directed in sections 16-11-101.8 (2) and 16-18.5-106.5 (3).

If a lottery winner owes a child support debt or arrearages or child support costs as described in section 44-40-113 (6), and also owes restitution, fines, fees, costs, or surcharges as described in sections 16-11-101.8 and 16-18.5-106.5, the lottery winnings offset against the child support debt or arrearages or costs shall take priority and be applied first. The remaining lottery winning money, if any, shall be applied second toward the payment of outstanding restitution, and then toward fines, fees, costs, or surcharges and processed in accordance with this section.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 356, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1128), ch. 238, p. 2359, § 4, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-35-212.5 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-40-115. Legal services.

The attorney general shall provide legal services for the division and the commission at the request of the director or the commission. The attorney general shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that there is continuity in the legal services provided and that the attorneys providing legal services to the division and the commission have expertise in the field.

The director shall cause the attorney general to make investigations and to prosecute and defend, on behalf of and in the name of the division, suits and proceedings for any of the purposes necessary and proper for carrying out the functions of the division.

Expenses of the attorney general incurred in the performance of his or her responsibilities under this section shall be paid from the lottery fund.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 357, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-35-213 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-40-116. Unlawful acts.

It is unlawful for any person:

To sell a lottery ticket or share at a price greater than or less than that fixed by the commission; however, a lottery ticket or share that is offered at no additional charge in conjunction with the sale of a product or service shall not be deemed to violate this section unless the offer is made to a person under eighteen years of age;

To sell a lottery ticket or share unless authorized or licensed by the director to do so, but this shall not prevent lottery tickets or shares from being given as gifts;

To sell a lottery ticket or share to any person under eighteen years of age or for any person under eighteen years of age to purchase a lottery ticket or share, but this shall not prevent receipt of a lottery ticket or share given as a gift to a person under eighteen years of age;

To sell a lottery ticket or share at any place other than that place authorized and specified on the license.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 357, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-35-214 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-40-117. Penalties.

In addition to any other penalties that may apply, any person violating any of the provisions of section 44-40-116 commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

Any person violating the sale restrictions of section 44-40-116 (1)(c) may also be proceeded against pursuant to section 18-6-701 for contributing to the delinquency of a minor.

Any person issuing, suspending, revoking, or renewing contracts pursuant to section 44-40-106 or licenses pursuant to section 44-40-107 for any personal pecuniary gain or any thing of value as defined in section 18-1-901 (3)(r), or any person violating any of the provisions of section 44-40-110, commits a class 3 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this article 40 relating to disclosure by providing any false or misleading information commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 358, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-35-215 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-40-118. Advertising.

Any promotional advertising regarding the lottery shall set forth the odds of winning and the average return on the dollar in prize money to the public. All promotional advertising expenses shall be paid from the lottery fund.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 358, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-35-216 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-40-119. Other laws inapplicable.

Any other state or local law in conflict with this article 40 is inapplicable, but this section does not supersede or affect part 6 of article 21 of title 24.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 358, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-35-217 as it existed prior to 2018.